Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-203
Authority; purpose for creation.

(1) The problems enumerated in section 58-202 cannot alone be remedied through the operation of private enterprise or individual communities or both but may be alleviated through the creation of a quasi-governmental body to:

(a) Encourage the investment of private capital and stimulate the construction of sanitary, safe, and uncrowded housing for low-income and moderate-income persons, particularly first-time homebuyers, through the use of public financing as provided by the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act at reasonable interest rates and by coordinating and cooperating with private industry and local communities which are essential to alleviating the conditions described in section 58-202 and are in the public interest;

(b) Encourage the investment of private capital to provide financing for farmers, particularly beginning farmers, and other agricultural enterprises of usual and customary size for such farming operations within the community at interest rates lower than those available in conventional farm credit markets which is essential to alleviating the conditions described in section 58-202 and is in the public interest;

(c) Encourage the investment of private capital and stimulate the creation of basic economic activity, the creation of jobs, the provision of adequate health care, and the expansion of the tax base throughout the state through the use of public financing and by coordinating with private industry and local communities which are essential to alleviating the conditions described in section 58-202 and are in the public interest;

(d) Encourage the investment of private capital and assist in the construction, development, rehabilitation, and improvement of wastewater treatment facilities and safe drinking water facilities in this state to provide for clean water to protect the health and welfare of the citizens and residents of this state and promote economic well-being which are essential to alleviating the conditions described in section 58-202 and are in the public interest;

(e) Encourage the investment of private capital and assist schools through the use of public financing in the abatement of environmental hazards and the reduction and elimination of accessibility barriers in their school buildings or on their school grounds in order to protect the health and welfare of the citizens and residents of this state and promote economic well-being which are essential to alleviating the conditions described in section 58-202 and are in the public interest;

(f) Encourage the investment of private capital and assist in financing the construction and operation of new solid waste disposal areas and facilities and the closure, monitoring, and remediation of former and existing solid waste disposal areas and facilities;

(g) Encourage the investment of private capital and stimulate the construction and operation of any public safety communication project through the use of public financing as provided by the act at reasonable interest rates which is essential to addressing the needs described in section 58-202 and is in the public interest; and

(h) Encourage cooperation with public agencies and the use of entrepreneurial methods and approaches to better access federal, state, and local government resources and to stimulate more private sector initiatives and joint public-private initiatives to carry out the purposes of the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act.

(2) Alleviating the conditions and problems enumerated in section 58-202 through encouragement of private investment by a quasi-governmental body is a public purpose and use for which public money provided by the sale of bonds may be borrowed, expended, advanced, loaned, or granted. Such activities shall not be conducted for profit. Such activities are proper governmental functions and can best be accomplished by the creation of a quasi-governmental body vested with the powers and duties specified in the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act. The necessity for the provisions of the act to protect the health, safety, morals, and general welfare of all the people of this state is hereby declared to be a matter of legislative determination. The quasi-governmental body created by the act shall make financing available for new or existing housing to serve those people, particularly first-time homebuyers, whom private industry is unable to serve at current interest rates, shall make financing available for farmers, particularly beginning farmers, shall make financing available for the construction, development, rehabilitation, and improvement of wastewater treatment facilities or safe drinking water facilities and for the construction, operation, closure, monitoring, and remediation of solid waste disposal areas and facilities in this state, shall make financing available to schools for the abatement of environmental hazards and the reduction and elimination of accessibility barriers, and shall make financing available for public safety communication projects in this state.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 311, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 3;

Laws 1992, LB 1001, § 4;

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 68;

Laws 1996, LB 1322, § 3;

Laws 2002, LB 1211, § 5;

Laws 2006, LB 693, § 3.